Utah, session 2026, SB23.
Section 1. Section 72-10-120 is amended to read:72-10-120. Violations -- Penalty.AExcept as otherwise provided in this part, a person who fails to comply with the requirements of or violates any provision of this part is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 72-10-134 is enacted to read:72-10-134. Restrictions on release of chemicals for solar geoengineering -- Criminal penalty -- Required reporting by airport operators.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Solar radiation management" means the release, injection, or dispersing of a chemical to artificially reduce the amount of solar radiation reaching the Earth's lower atmosphere or surface.(b)(i)"Solar geoengineering" means the modification of the composition, behavior, or dynamics of the Earth's atmosphere by solar radiation management.(ii)"Solar geoengineering" does not include activities described in Title 73, Chapter 15, Modification of Weather.(2)(a)It is unlawful for an owner or operator of an aircraft to use or authorize the use of the aircraft in the state with the intent to cause solar geoengineering.(b)A violation of Subsection (2)(a) is a third degree felony punishable by:(i)imprisonment as provided in Section 76-3-203; and(ii)a fine not exceeding $100,000.(3)The department shall:(a)provide a means for a person to electronically submit information regarding suspected solar geoengineering activity; and(b)report a credible instance of suspected solar geoengineering activity to the Office of the Attorney General.(4)An airport operator shall report to the department any suspectedknown solar geoengineering activity at an airport owned or operated by the airport operator.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.